Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Annual Supplement, 201546-1139
Engaging in chemigation without a permit; penalty; recovery of costs.

Any person who engages in chemigation without first obtaining a chemigation permit shall be (1) subject to a civil penalty of one thousand dollars for each day at each site where a violation occurs for the first violation and not less than one thousand dollars and not more than five thousand dollars for each day at each site where a violation occurs for each subsequent violation or (2) guilty of a Class II misdemeanor. Each day of continued violation shall constitute a separate offense. The court may issue such injunctive orders as may be necessary to prohibit continued violations of the Nebraska Chemigation Act. When the Attorney General, a county attorney, or a private attorney brings an action on behalf of a district to recover a civil penalty under this section, the district shall recover the costs of the action if a civil penalty is awarded.

Laws 1986, LB 284, § 39;

Laws 2015, LB207, § 1.
August 30, 2015